es: Estilo de uso de la correa: Convertible; Bandolera; Bucle para el dedo; Multiposición; Cordón para cuello; Correa para el hombro; Correa para cintura; Correa para muñeca; Otros
tr: Askı takma stili: Dönüştürülebilir; Çapraz askılı; Parmak halkası; Çok yönlü; Boyun askısı; Omuz askısı; Bel askısı; Bilek askısı; Diğer
sk-SK: Štýl nosenia popruhu: Rozkladací; Popruh vez rameno crossbody; Slučka na prst; Viacúčelový; Krčná šnúrka; Ramenný popruh; Pásový popruh; Zápästný popruh; Iné
pt-PT: Estilo de utilização da alça: Conversível; Alça de tiracolo; Laço de dedo; Multiusos; Cordão de pescoço; Alça de ombro; Alça de cintura; Correia de pulso; Outro
pl: Styl noszenia paska: Wymienna; Pasek przez głowę; Pętla na palec; Wielokierunkowy; Smycz na szyję; Pas naramienny; Pasek na biodra; Pasek na nadgarstek; Inne
sl-SI: Način nošenja paščka: Pretvorljivo; Pas čez telo; Prstna zanka; Večnamenski; Vratna vrvica; Naramnica; Pasni trak; Zapestni trak; Drugo
da: Stropbæremetode: Konvertibel; Crossbodyrem; Fingerløkke; Multi-vejs; Halsnøglesnor; Skulderstrop; Taljerem; Håndledsrem; Andet
fi: Hihnan käyttötapa: Muunnettava; Crossbody-hihna; Sormen silmukka; Monitoimi; Kaulanauha; Olkahihna; Vyötäröhihna; Rannehihna; Muu
it: Stile di utilizzo della cinghia: Convertibile; Tracolla; Anello per dita; Multi-uso; Cordino da collo; Tracolla; Cintura da vita; Cinturino da polso; Altro
hu: Szíjhordási stílus: Átalakítható; Testen átvethető szíj; Ujjgyűrű; Többféleképpen viselhető; Nyakpánt; Vállheveder; Derékpánt; Csuklópánt; Egyéb
bg-BG: Стил на носене на каишката: Преходно; Каишка за кръст; Примка за пръст; Многофункционална; Каишка за врата; Каишка за рамо; Каишка за кръста; Каишка за китката; Други
ru: Стиль ношения ремня: Трансформер; Ремень через плечо; Петля для пальца; Универсальный; Шейный шнурок; Плечевой ремень; Поясной ремень; Наручный ремешок; Другой
nl: Draagstijl van riem: Converteerbaar; Kruisband; Vinger lus; Meerdere manieren; Nek koord; Schouderband; Tailleband; Polsband; Andere
pt-BR: Estilo de uso da alça: Conversível; Alça transversal; Laço de dedo; Múltiplas formas; Cordão de pescoço; Alça de ombro; Alça de cintura; Alça de pulso; Outro
fr: Style de cordon: Convertible; Bandoulière; Boucle de doigt; Multi-usage; Tour de cou; Sangle d’épaule; Sangle de taille; Dragonne; Autre
cs: Styl nošení řemínku: Konvertibilní; Pás přes prsa; Smyčka na prst; Víceúčelový; Krční šňůrka; Ramenní popruh; Bederní popruh; Zápěstní pásek; Jiné
ja: ストラップの装着スタイル: コンバーチブル; クロスボディストラップ; フィンガーループ; マルチウェイ; ネックストラップ; ショルダーストラップ; ウエストストラップ; リストストラップ; その他
sv: Remmens bärstil: Konvertibel; Crossbody-rem; Fingerögla; Flervägsbärbar; Halsband; Axelband; Midjeband; Handledsband; Övrigt
zh-TW: 背帶配戴方式: 可轉換; 斜背帶; 指環; 多用途; 頸掛繩; 肩背; 腰帶; 腕帶; 其他
zh-CN: 背带佩戴方式: 可转换; 斜挎带; 指环; 多种佩戴方式; 颈部挂绳; 肩带; 腰带; 腕带; 其他
el: Στυλ φορέματος ιμάντα: Πολυχρηστικό; Χιαστί ιμάντας; Βρόχος δακτύλου; Πολλαπλών χρήσεων; Κορδόνι λαιμού; Ιμάντας ώμου; Λουράκι μέσης; Λουράκι καρπού; Άλλο
lt-LT: Dirželio dėvėjimo stilius: Kanalinis; Dirželis per petį; Kilpa pirštams; Daugiakryptis; Kaklo virvė; Peties dirželis; Juosmens dirželis; Riešo dirželis; Kita
th: รูปแบบการสวมใส่สาย: ปรับรูปแบบได้; สายสะพายข้าง; ห่วงคล้องนิ้ว; หลายแบบ; สายคล้องคอ; สายสะพายไหล่; สายคาดเอว; สายรัดข้อมือ; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Stil nošenja remena: Promjenjivo; Remen za nošenje preko tijela; Petlja za prste; Višenačinski; Vrpca za vrat; Remen za nošenje preko ramena; Pojasni remen; Remen za zapešće; Ostalo
ro-RO: Tip de purtare a curelei: Convertibilă; Bandulieră; Cu bandă; Multiplu; Șnur pentru gât; Curea de umăr; Curea pentru talie; Curea pentru încheietură; Altele
de: Trageart des Riemens: Konvertierbar; Umhängegurt; Fingerschlaufe; Mehrwege; Halsband; Schulterriemen; Taillengurt; Handgelenkband; Sonstiges
vi: Kiểu đeo dây: Chuyển đổi; Dây đeo chéo; Vòng ngón tay; Nhiều cách đeo; Dây đeo cổ; Dây đeo vai; Dây đeo eo; Dây đeo cổ tay; Khác
en: Strap wearing style: Convertible; Crossbody strap; Finger loop; Multi-way; Neck lanyard; Shoulder strap; Waist strap; Wrist strap; Other
nb: Måte å bære stroppen på: Omformbar; Crossbodystropp; Fingerløkke; Flerveis; Halssnor; Skulderstropper; Hoftereim; Håndleddsreim; Annet
ko: 스트랩 착용 방식: 컨버터블; 크로스바디 스트랩; 핑거 루프; 멀티웨이; 목걸이 끈; 어깨 스트랩; 허리끈; 손목끈; 기타